Tables/Contraction/lt.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2026 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - Lithuanian (uncontracted)
#
# Copyright (C) 2017 Rimas Kudelis <rq@akl.lt>
# Copyright (C) 2017 Tadas Matusevičius <tadas.matus@gmail.com>
#
# The Lithuanian 6-dot Braille alphabet is described in a decree
# no. 878 of the Minister of Education, called "Dėl perėjimo prie
# naujos lietuviškos Brailio rašto abėcėlės tvarkos ir programos",
# which is in effect since 2000-07-08. Document number is 55-1620. At
# the time of writing this file, the document was accessible at
# https://www.e-tar.lt/portal/lt/legalAct/TAR.A110E8E6A83F .
# The document is referred to as "the standard" below.
#
# The standard specifies only the mapping of Lithuanian letters to 6-dot
# Braille writing system, no other characters are defined in it.
# Definitions of some punctuation and other characters are informally
# available on the Internet.
#
# This table builds on from these bits of information, but also adds
# a number of other definitions to make it more useful in computing.
#
# This table is based on the respective liblouis table.

###
### WHITESPACE
###

include spaces.cti

always \x09 0-0             U+0009 CHARACTER TABULATION


###
### LETTERS
###

# Base Latin letters
include letters-latin.cti

# Letters with diacritics which are part of the Lithuanian alphabet
always ą 16
always Ą 16
always č 146
always Č 146
always ę 156
always Ę 156
always ė 345
always Ė 345
always į 246
always Į 246
always š 2346
always Š 2346
always ų 346
always Ų 346
always ū 1256
always Ū 1256
always ž 126
always Ž 126


###
### DIGITS
###

always 1 1
always 2 12
always 3 14
always 4 145
always 5 15
always 6 124
always 7 1245
always 8 125
always 9 24
always 0 245


###
### PUNCTUATION
###

always , 2
always . 256
always ? 26
always ! 235
always : 25
always ; 23
always " 4
always ' 3
# According to Unicode, this is the preferred character to use for apostrophe.
always ’ 3                  U+2019 RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK

always ( 2356
always ) 2356
always [ 12356
always ] 23456
always { 6-246
always } 6-135

always \x2D 36              U+002D - HYPHEN-MINUS
always \u2013 6-36          U+2013 – EN DASH
always \xAD 36              U+00AD [SOFT HYPHEN]
always \u2010 36            U+2010 ‐ HYPHEN
always \u2011 36            U+2011 ‑ NON-BREAKING HYPHEN
always \u2012 36            U+2012 ‒ FIGURE DASH
always \u2014 36            U+2014 — EM DASH
always \u2015 36            U+2015 ― HORIZONTAL BAR

# These are the typographically correct quotes in Lithuanian texts.
always „ 236                U+201E DOUBLE LOW-9 QUOTATION MARK
always “ 356                U+201C LEFT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK

# The following quotation characters should not be used in Lithuanian texts.
always ” 6-4                U+201D RIGHT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK
always ” 6-4                U+201F DOUBLE HIGH-REVERSED-9 QUOTATION MARK
always « 6-4                U+00AB LEFT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK
always » 6-4                U+00BB RIGHT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK
always ‹ 6-4                U+2039 SINGLE LEFT-POINTING ANGLE QUOTATION MARK
always › 6-4                U+203A SINGLE RIGHT-POINTING ANGLE QUOTATION MARK

always … 256-256-256        U+2026 HORIZONTAL ELLIPSIS
repeatable … 256-256-256    U+2026 HORIZONTAL ELLIPSIS
repeatable ... 256-256-256  Three times U+002E FULL STOP


###
### MATHEMATICAL SYMBOLS
###

always + 5-235
always − 5-36               U+2212 MINUS SIGN
always < 5-246
always = 5-2356
always > 5-135
always ± 5-235-36
always ∓ 5-36-235           U+2213 MINUS-OR-PLUS SIGN
always × 5-3
always ⋅ 5-3                U+22C5 DOT OPERATOR
always ÷ 5-256
always ∶ 5-256              U+2236 RATIO
always ⁄ 34                 U+2044 FRACTION SLASH
always ∕ 34                 U+2215 DIVISION SLASH


###
### OTHER CHARACTERS
###

always # 6-3456
always $ 6-46
always % 123456
always & 12346
always * 35
always / 34
always @ 6-345
always \\ 6-34
always ^ 6-256
always _ 1456
always | 6-456
#always ¦ 6-1456
always § 6-346
#always ¬ 6-235
always µ 6-134
#always ¶ 6-1234

always ` 6-3
always ~ 6-26

#always ¢ 6-14
always £ 6-123
always € 6-15               U+20AC EURO SIGN

always • 6-35               U+2022 BULLET

always © 2356-46-14-2356
always ® 2356-46-1235-2356
always ℗ 2356-46-1234-2356  U+2117 SOUND RECORDING COPYRIGHT

always ← 246-25             U+2190 LEFTWARDS ARROW
always → 25-135             U+2192 RIGHTWARDS ARROW

# Middle dot is unlikely to appear in text, except perhaps as a multiplication sign (dot operator).
always · 5-3                U+00B7 MIDDLE DOT

always ° 5-356
always ′ 5-35               U+2032 PRIME
always ″ 5-35-35            U+2033 DOUBLE PRIME

always ℃ 5-356-46-14        U+2103 DEGREE CELSIUS
always ℉ 5-356-46-124       U+2109 DEGREE FAHRENHEIT


###
### INDICATOR AND SPECIAL SYMBOL DIRECTIVES
###

#always \uFFFD 7             U+FFFD � REPLACEMENT CHARACTER

numsign 3456  number sign, just one operand
letsign 56
capsign 46
begcaps 456
endcaps 56

midnum , 2
midnum : 25
midnum . 256

# when a decimal begins with a period, it should be translated with a 
# number sign followed by a decimal point, followed by the number.
